Utah statutes.
52-7-204.   Claim and bill given to legislative fiscal analyst and Office of
Legislative Research and General Counsel -- Independent review available --
Private sources of funds to be considered -- Power of Legislature to adjust or
refuse claim.
(1)  A public officer who meets the requirements of this chapter shall submit
the public officer’s claim for payment of attorney fees and court costs, and
a copy of the bills that the public officer received from the attorney who
represented him, to both the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the
Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel.
(2)  Upon receipt of a claim from the public officer, the legislative fiscal
analyst or the legislative general counsel may, at the direction of the
Legislative Management Committee, submit the claim for attorney fees to an
independent entity to review the attorney fees and to recommend an appropriate
fee.
(3)  In considering whether or not to pay the claim, the Legislature may
consider whether or not there are other sources, including private sources, to
pay the claim.
(4)  The Legislature may pay the claim in full, adjust the claim, or refuse to
pay the claim.
